Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska75-369
Nebraska State Patrol; provide declaration of safety regulations; distribution; acknowledgment of applicant.

The Nebraska State Patrol shall provide each county treasurer and the Department of Motor Vehicles with copies of a declaration which states that the motor carrier safety regulations in sections 75-362 to 75-369.07 have been enacted into state law. The declaration shall be distributed by the county treasurers and the Department of Motor Vehicles to each applicant for registration of commercial motor vehicles subject to sections 75-363 and 75-364. The applicant shall sign the registration form to acknowledge that the applicant has read the declaration and is aware that the motor carrier safety regulations are part of state law. Nothing in this section shall be construed to impose any liability upon any county treasurer or the Department of Motor Vehicles or any employee thereof as a result of any act or failure to act under this section.

Laws 1986, LB 301, § 7;

Laws 2003, LB 480, § 6;

Laws 2006, LB 1007, § 17.